Utah statutes.
31A-22-717.   Provisions pertaining to service members and their families affected by mobilization into the armed forces.

For any group or blanket accident and health coverage, an insurer:

(1)  may not refuse to reinstate an insured or his family whose coverage lapsed due to the insured's mobilization into the United States armed forces provided application is made within 180 days of release from active duty;

(2)  shall reinstate an insured in full upon payment of the first premium without the requirement of a waiting period or exclusion for preexisting conditions or any other underwriting requirements that were covered previously; and

(3)  may not increase the insured's premium in excess of what it would have been increased in the normal course of time had the insured not been mobilized into the United States armed forces.

